Utah statutes.
63G-12-208.   Conditions during permit term.

(1)  A permit holder shall continue to meet the eligibility criteria under Section 63G-12-205 or 63G-12-206 for the type of permit held by the permit holder.

(2)  A permit is automatically revoked if after issuance of the permit:

(a)  the permit holder to whom it is issued is convicted of, pleads guilty to, pleads no contest to, pleads guilty in a similar manner to, or has resolved by diversion or its equivalent a serious felony;

(b)  for a guest worker permit, the permit holder to whom it is issued does not provide services under a contract for hire for more than one year; or

(c)  for an immediate family permit, the guest worker permit under which the immediate family member's permit is issued is revoked or expires under this part.

